Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 8. Duties and Powers of Trustee.

§ 91-8-801.
Duty to administer trust.

Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, the trustee shall administer the trust until such time as the trust terminates or a successor trustee is appointed and all assets are delivered in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-802.
Duty of loyalty.

A trustee shall administer the trust solely in the interests of the beneficiaries.

Subject to the rights of persons dealing with or assisting the trustee as provided in Section 91-8-1012 or as may otherwise be allowed under Mississippi law, a sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property entered into by the trustee for the trustee’s own personal account or which is otherwise affected by a conflict between the trustee’s fiduciary and personal interests is voidable by a beneficiary affected by the transaction unless:

The transaction was authorized by the terms of the trust;

The transaction was approved by the court;

The beneficiary did not commence a judicial proceeding within the time allowed by Section 91-8-1005;

The beneficiary consented to the trustee’s conduct, ratified the transaction, or released the trustee in compliance with Section 91-8-1009; or

The transaction involves a contract entered into or claim acquired by the trustee before the person became or contemplated becoming trustee.

“Investment” shall mean any security as defined in Section 2(a)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933, any contract of sale of a commodity for future delivery within the meaning of Section 2(i) of the Commodity Exchange Act, or any other asset permitted for fiduciary accounts pursuant to the terms of the Mississippi Uniform Prudent Investor Act or by the terms of the governing instrument, including by way of illustration and not limitation: shares or interests in a public or private investment fund, including, but not limited to, a public or private investment fund organized as a limited partnership, limited liability company, statutory or common-law business trust, real estate investment trust, joint venture or other general or limited partnership, or an open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940.

The placing of securities transactions by a trustee through a securities broker that is part of the same company as the trustee, is owned by the trustee, or is affiliated with the trustee;

Any loan from the trustee or its affiliate;

An investment in an insurance contract purchased from an insurance agency owned by, or affiliated with the trustee, or any of its affiliates; or

A delegation and any transaction made pursuant to the delegation from a trustee to an agent that is affiliated or associated with the trustee.

A sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property is presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if it is entered into by the trustee with:

The trustee’s spouse;

The trustee’s descendants, siblings, parents, or their spouses;

An agent or attorney of the trustee; or

A corporation or other person or enterprise in which the trustee, or a person that owns a significant interest in the trustee, has an interest that might affect the trustee’s best judgment.

A transaction not concerning trust property in which the trustee engages in the trustee’s individual capacity involves a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the transaction concerns an opportunity properly belonging to the trust.

In addition to all other permissible investments and delegatable duties listed in this title, so long as they are fairly priced and in accordance with the interest of the beneficiaries and the interests of the fiduciary’s appointment and otherwise comply with the Mississippi Uniform Prudent Investor Act or Article 12 of this chapter, a fiduciary may purchase, sell, hold or otherwise deal with an affiliate or an interest in an affiliated investment, as well as delegate to an affiliate or other agent associated with the fiduciary and, upon satisfaction of the conditions stated in subsection (g), the fiduciary may receive fiduciary compensation from the account at the same rate as the fiduciary would otherwise be entitled to be compensated. These activities shall occur without any presumption of a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests of the trustee or other fiduciary.

As used in this section:

“Affiliate” means any corporation or other entity that directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the fiduciary.

“Affiliated investment” means an investment for which the fiduciary or an affiliate of the fiduciary acts as adviser, administrator, distributor, placement agent, underwriter, broker or in any other capacity for which it receives or has received a fee or commission from the investment or an investment acquired or disposed of in a transaction for which the fiduciary or an affiliate of the fiduciary receives or has received a fee or commission. “Affiliated investment” also means an investment in an insurance contract purchased from an insurance agency owned by, or affiliated with, the fiduciary, or any of its affiliates.

“Delegate to an affiliate or associated agent” means a proper delegation of any duty of the fiduciary to any person or entity that is affiliated with, or associated with, the fiduciary. The action of doing any of the above shall be known as a “delegation to an affiliate or associated agent.”

“Fee or commission” means compensation paid to a fiduciary or an affiliate thereof on account of its services to or on behalf of an investment.

For purposes of this section, “fiduciary” means any fiduciary as defined in Section 91-8-103, as well as any other fiduciary.

A fiduciary seeking compensation pursuant to subsection (e) shall, as is applicable relative to the fiduciary’s particular appointment, disclose either: to those persons entitled to be kept informed about the administration of a trust under Section 91-8-813(a), subject to the provisions of Sections 91-8-813(d) and 91-8-105(d); to each principal in an agency relationship; or to all current recipients of statements of any other fiduciary account not described above; all fees or commissions paid or to be paid by the account, or received or to be received by an affiliate arising from such affiliated investment or delegation to an affiliate or associated agent. The disclosure required under this subsection (g) may be given either in a copy of the prospectus or any other disclosure document prepared for the affiliated investment under federal or state securities laws or in a written summary that includes all fees or commissions received or to be received by the fiduciary or any affiliate of the fiduciary and an explanation of the manner in which such fees or commissions are calculated, either as a percentage of the assets invested or by some other method. The disclosure shall be made at least annually unless there has been no increase in the rate at which fees or commissions are calculated since the most recent disclosure. Notwithstanding this subsection (g), no such disclosure is required if the governing instrument or a court order expressly authorizes the fiduciary to invest the fiduciary account in affiliated investments or to perform the delegation to an affiliate or associated agent.

A fiduciary that has complied with subsection (g), whether by making the applicable disclosure or by relying on the terms of a governing instrument or court order, shall have full authority to administer an affiliated investment, including the authority to vote proxies thereon, without regard to the affiliation between the fiduciary and the investment or the fiduciary and delegatee, as the case may be.

In voting shares of stock or in exercising powers of control over similar interests in other forms of enterprise, the trustee shall act in the best interests of the beneficiaries. If the trust is the sole owner of a corporation or other form of enterprise, the trustee shall elect or appoint directors or other managers who will manage the corporation or enterprise in the best interests of the beneficiaries.

The following transactions, if fairly priced and in accordance with the interest of the beneficiaries and the purposes of the trust, are not presumed to be affected by a conflict between the trustee’s personal and fiduciary interest if any investment made pursuant to the transaction otherwise complies with the Mississippi Prudent Investor Act:

An agreement between a trustee and a beneficiary relating to the appointment or compensation of the trustee, or any of its affiliates;

Payment of reasonable compensation to the trustee, or any of its affiliates;

A transaction between a trust and another trust, decedent’s estate, guardianship, or conservatorship of which the trustee is a fiduciary or in which a beneficiary has an interest;

A deposit of trust money in a regulated financial-service institution operated by the trustee or an affiliate;

An advance by the trustee of money for the protection of the trust;

An investment by a trustee in securities of an investment company or investment trust to which the trustee, or its affiliates, provides services in a capacity other than as a trustee provided that any investment made pursuant to the transaction otherwise complies with the Mississippi Prudent Investor Act;

The court may appoint a special fiduciary to make a decision with respect to any proposed transaction that might violate this section if entered into by the trustee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-803.
Impartiality.

If a trust has two (2) or more beneficiaries, the trustee shall act impartially in investing, managing, and distributing the trust property, giving due regard to the beneficiaries’ respective interests and the purposes of the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-804.
Prudent administration.

A trustee shall administer the trust as a prudent person would, by considering the purposes, terms, distributional requirements, and other circumstances of the trust. In satisfying this standard, the trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-805.
Costs of administration.

In administering a trust, the trustee may incur only costs that are reasonable in relation to the trust property, the purposes of the trust, and the skills of the trustee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 63, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-806.
Trustee’s skills.

A trustee who has special skills or expertise, or is named trustee in reliance upon the trustee’s representation that the trustee has special skills or expertise, shall use those special skills or expertise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 64, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-807.
Delegation by trustee.

A trustee may delegate duties and powers that a prudent trustee could properly delegate under the circumstances. The trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution in:

Selecting an agent;

Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes and terms of the trust; and

Periodically reviewing the agent’s actions in order to monitor the agent’s performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the trust to exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution to comply with the terms of the delegation.

A trustee who complies with subsection (a) is not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for an action or inaction of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting a delegation of powers or duties from the trustee of a trust that is subject to the law of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 65, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-808.
Powers to direct.

While a trust is revocable, the trustee may follow a direction of the settlor that is contrary to the terms of the trust or contrary to the normal practice of the trustee in regard to the action requested.

If the terms of a trust confer upon a person other than the settlor of a revocable trust power to direct certain actions of the trustee, the trustee shall act in accordance with an exercise of the power.

The terms of a trust may confer upon a trustee or other person a power to direct the modification or termination of the trust.

If a person holds a power to direct pursuant to Article 12 of this chapter, that person is a trust advisor, trust protector, or both. The power holder is subject to all the provisions of Article 12, including any duties prescribed by Article 12 and any provisions that make the power holder a fiduciary. Any trustee or other person that under Article 12 is relieved of any duty or any liability, or is otherwise protected under Article 12, shall be so relieved and otherwise protected.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 66, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-809.
Control and protection of trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to take control of and protect the trust property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-810.
Recordkeeping and identification of trust property.

A trustee shall keep adequate records of the administration of the trust.

A trustee shall keep trust property separate from the trustee’s own property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), a trustee shall cause the trust property to be designated so that the interest of the trust, to the extent feasible, appears in records maintained by a party other than a trustee or beneficiary.

If the trustee maintains records clearly indicating the respective interests, a trustee may invest as a whole the property of two (2) or more separate trusts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 68, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-811.
Enforcement and defense of claims.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to enforce claims of the trust and to defend claims against the trust.

A trustee may abandon or assign any claim that it believes is unreasonable to enforce to one or more of the beneficiaries of the trust holding the claim.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 69, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-812.
Collecting trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to compel a former trustee or other person to deliver trust property to the trustee, and to redress a breach of trust known to the trustee to have been committed by a former trustee. No successor trustee appointed after the examination of the accounts of a trustee or the waiver of the examination by the beneficiaries shall be responsible for the acts and omissions of the prior trustee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 70, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-813.
Duty to inform and report.

(1) A trustee shall keep the beneficiaries of the trust that are current mandatory or permissible distributees of trust income or principal, or both, reasonably informed about the administration of the trust and of the material facts necessary for them to protect their interests.

Unless unreasonable under the circumstances, a trustee shall respond in a reasonable amount of time to a qualified beneficiary’s request for information related to the administration of the trust. Additionally, a qualified beneficiary shall reimburse the trustee for any reasonable expenses incurred in responding to requests for information.

The requirements of subsection (a) shall also apply to the benefit of anyone who, in a capacity other than that of a fiduciary, holds a power of appointment.

The trustee of an irrevocable or nongrantor trust within sixty (60) days after the acceptance and funding of a trust, excluding nominal funding for the trust to have corpus or the depositing of insurance policies on the life of a living person, shall notify each current income beneficiary, each vested ultimate beneficiary of a remainder interest and anyone who, in a capacity other than that of a fiduciary, holds a power of appointment, that the trust has been established.

The required notice shall:

Be sent by first-class mail or personal delivery; and

Consist of either a complete copy of the document establishing the trust together with the trustee’s name, address and telephone number or an abstract of the trust, as the trustee, in the trustee’s absolute discretion, may choose.

The abstract shall contain:

The name, address and telephone number of each trustee; and

If for a current income beneficiary:

The number of other current income beneficiaries;

Whether distributions of income are required or discretionary; and

Whether distributions of principal are permitted and, if so, for what purpose or purposes; and

If for a remainder beneficiary:

The number of other remainder beneficiaries; and

The conditions that must be met before the beneficiary’s share is distributable.

If for anyone who, in a capacity other than that of a fiduciary, holds a power of appointment, all of the information required by subsection (b) necessary or beneficial for that person to effectively determine whether or not to exercise that power of appointment.

Upon the termination of an interest of any one or more of the current income beneficiaries:

A beneficiary may waive the right to a trustee’s report or other information otherwise required to be furnished under this section. A beneficiary, with respect to future reports and other information, may withdraw a waiver previously given. Anyone who, in a capacity other than that of a fiduciary, holds a power of appointment has the same power as provided a beneficiary in this subsection to waive reports and other information and to withdraw a waiver previously given.

Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to the extent that those provisions are waived or modified in accordance with Section 91-8-105(d).

Subsection (a)(1) and subsection (b) do not apply to a trust created under a trust agreement that became irrevocable before July 1, 2014. Trust law in effect before July 1, 2014, regarding the subject matter of subsection (a)(1) and subsection (b) shall continue to apply to those trusts.

If the trustee of a trust is bound by any written confidentiality restrictions with respect to an asset of a trust, a trustee may require that any beneficiary who is eligible to receive information pursuant to this or any other section of this chapter about the asset shall agree in writing to be bound by the confidentiality restrictions that bind the trustee before receiving the information from the trustee.

A trust advisor, trust protector, or other fiduciary designated by the terms of the trust shall keep each excluded fiduciary designated by the terms of the trust reasonably informed about:

The administration of the trust with respect to any specific duty or function being performed by the trust advisor, trust protector, or other fiduciary to the extent that the duty or function would normally be performed by the excluded fiduciary or to the extent that providing the information to the excluded fiduciary is reasonably necessary for the excluded fiduciary to perform its duties; and

Any other material information that the excluded fiduciary would be required to disclose to the specified beneficiaries under subsection (a) without regard to whether the terms of the trust relieve the excluded fiduciary from providing the information to qualified beneficiaries. Neither the performance nor the failure to perform of a trust advisor, trust protector, or other fiduciary designated by the terms of the trust as provided in this subsection shall affect the limitation on the liability of any excluded fiduciary provided by Article 12 of this chapter.

The trustee shall similarly notify the income beneficiaries who are takers of the terminated interest of their interest by sending or delivering them the notice required in subsection (b); and

If at that time the period described in subsection (b) has lapsed, the trustee shall similarly notify anyone who, in a capacity other than that of a fiduciary, holds a power of appointment by sending or delivering to the person the notice required in subsection (b).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 71, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-814.
Exercise of powers over discretionary and other interests; tax savings.

Relative to exercise of powers over discretionary and other interests:

“Improper motive” means to demonstrate action such as the following:

A trustee refusing to make or limiting distributions to beneficiaries other than the trustee due to the trustee’s self-interest when the trustee also holds a beneficial interest subject to a discretionary interest; or

A trustee making a distribution in excess of an ascertainable standard to himself or herself as beneficiary when the trustee is restricted by an ascertainable standard in the trust.

Unless otherwise provided in the trust:

If the settlor’s spouse is named as a beneficiary, the settlor is still living and the trust is classified as a support trust, then the trustee shall consider the resources of the settlor’s spouse, including the settlor’s obligation of support, before making a distribution; and

In all other cases, unless otherwise provided in the trust, the trustee need not consider the beneficiary’s resources in determining whether a distribution should be made.

The following provisions apply only to discretionary interests:

A reasonableness standard shall not be applied to the exercise of discretion by the trustee with regard to a discretionary interest;

Other than for the three (3) circumstances listed in subsection (b) (2), a court has no jurisdiction to review the trustee’s discretion or to force a distribution; and

Absent express language in the trust instrument to the contrary, if the distribution language in a discretionary interest permits unequal distributions between beneficiaries or distributions to the exclusion of other beneficiaries, the trustee may distribute all of the accumulated, accrued, or undistributed income and principal to one (1) beneficiary in the trustee’s discretion.

A discretionary interest is neither a property interest nor an enforceable right; it is a mere expectancy;

A court may review a trustee’s distribution discretion only if the trustee acts dishonestly, acts with an improper motive, or fails to act, if under a duty to do so;

The following provisions apply only to mandatory or support interests:

A beneficiary of a mandatory or a support interest has an enforceable right to a distribution pursuant to a court’s review;

A trustee’s distribution decision may be reviewed for unreasonableness, dishonesty, improper motivation, or failure to act, if under a duty to do so; and

In the case of a support interest, nothing in this section shall raise a beneficiary’s support interest to the level of a property interest.

Unless otherwise provided in subsection (f), and unless the terms of the trust expressly indicate that a rule in this subsection does not apply:

A person other than a settlor who is a beneficiary and trustee of a trust that confers on the trustee a power to make discretionary distributions to or for the trustee’s personal benefit may exercise the power only in accordance with an ascertainable standard; and

A trustee may not exercise a power to make discretionary distributions to satisfy a legal obligation of support that the trustee personally owes another person.

A power that is limited or prohibited by subsection (d) may be exercised by a majority of the remaining trustees whose exercise of the power is not so limited or prohibited. If the power of all trustees is so limited or prohibited, the court may appoint a special fiduciary with authority to exercise the power.

Subsection (d) shall not apply to:

A power held by the settlor’s spouse who is the trustee of a trust for which a marital deduction, as defined in Section 2056(b) (5) or 2523(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, was previously allowed;

Any trust during any period that the trust may be revoked or amended by its settlor; or

A trust if contributions to the trust qualify for the annual exclusion under Section 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 72; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-815.
General powers of trustee.

A trustee, without authorization by the court, may exercise:

Powers conferred by the terms of the trust; and

Except as limited by the terms of the trust:

All powers over the trust property which an unmarried competent owner has over individually owned property;

Any other powers appropriate to achieve the proper investment, management, and distribution of the trust property; and

Any other powers conferred by this chapter.

The exercise of a power is subject to the fiduciary duties prescribed by this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 73, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-816.
Specific powers of trustee.

Any references contained in a will or trust incorporating by reference the powers enumerated in Section 91-9-101 et seq. will incorporate by reference the powers contained in this section.

Unless the terms of the instrument expressly provide otherwise and without limiting the authority conferred by Section 91-8-815, a trustee may:

Collect trust property and accept or reject additions to the trust property from a settlor or any other person;

Acquire or sell property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale;

Exchange, partition, or otherwise change the character of trust property;

Deposit trust money in an account in a regulated financial-service institution;

Borrow money, with or without security, and mortgage or pledge trust property for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

With respect to an interest in a proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, corporation, or other form of business or enterprise, continue the business or other enterprise and take any action that may be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners, including merging, dissolving, or otherwise changing the form of business organization or contributing additional capital;

With respect to stocks or other securities, exercise the rights of an absolute owner, including the right to:

Vote, or give proxies to vote, with or without power of substitution, or enter into or continue a voting trust agreement;

Hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the trust so that title may pass by delivery;

Pay calls, assessments, and other sums chargeable or accruing against the securities, and sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; and

Deposit the securities with a depository or other regulated financial-service institution;

With respect to an interest in real property, construct or make ordinary or extraordinary repairs to, alterations to, or improvements in, buildings or other structures, demolish improvements, raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings, subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use or grant public or private easements, and make or vacate plats and adjust boundaries;

Enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor or lessee, including a lease or other arrangement for exploration and removal of natural resources, with or without the option to purchase or renew, for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

Grant an option involving a sale, lease, or other disposition of trust property or acquire an option for the acquisition of property, including an option exercisable beyond the duration of the trust, and exercise an option so acquired;

Insure the property of the trust against damage or loss and insure the trustee, the trustee’s agents, and beneficiaries against liability arising from the administration of the trust;

Abandon or decline to administer property of no value or of insufficient value to justify its collection or continued administration;

With respect to possible liability for violation of environmental law:

Inspect or investigate property the trustee holds or has been asked to hold, or property owned or operated by an organization in which the trustee holds or has been asked to hold an interest, for the purpose of determining the application of environmental law with respect to the property;

Take action to prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy any actual or potential violation of any environmental law affecting property held directly or indirectly by the trustee, whether taken before or after the assertion of a claim or the initiation of governmental enforcement;

Decline to accept property into trust or disclaim any power with respect to property that is or may be burdened with liability for violation of environmental law;

Compromise claims against the trust which may be asserted for an alleged violation of environmental law; and

Pay the expense of any inspection, review, abatement, or remedial action to comply with environmental law;

Pay or contest any claim, settle a claim by or against the trust, and release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the trust;

Pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the trustee and of employees and agents of the trust, and other expenses incurred in the administration of the trust;

Exercise elections with respect to federal, state, and local taxes, including allocating capital gains to distributable net income;

Select a mode of payment under any employee benefit or retirement plan, annuity, or life insurance payable to the trustee, exercise rights thereunder, including exercise of the right to indemnification for expenses and against liabilities, and take appropriate action to collect the proceeds;

Make loans out of trust property, including loans to a beneficiary on terms and conditions the trustee considers to be fair and reasonable under the circumstances, where the trustee has a lien on future distributions for repayment of those loans;

Pledge trust property to guarantee loans made by others to the beneficiary;

Appoint a trustee to act in another jurisdiction with respect to trust property located in the other jurisdiction, confer upon the appointed trustee all of the powers and duties of the appointing trustee, require that the appointed trustee furnish security, and remove any trustee so appointed;

Pay an amount distributable to a beneficiary who is under a legal disability or who the trustee reasonably believes is incapacitated, by paying it directly to the beneficiary or applying it for the beneficiary’s benefit, or by:

Paying it to the conservator or guardian of the beneficiary’s estate or, if there is no conservator or guardian of the beneficiary’s estate, to the conservator or guardian of the beneficiary;

Paying it to the beneficiary’s custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, and, for that purpose, creating a custodianship or custodial trust;

If the trustee does not know of a conservator, guardian, custodian, or custodial trustee, paying it to an adult relative or other person having legal or physical care or custody of the beneficiary, to be expended on the beneficiary’s behalf; or

Managing it as a separate fund on the beneficiary’s behalf, subject to the beneficiary’s continuing right to withdraw the distribution;

On distribution of trust property or the division or termination of a trust, make distributions in divided or undivided interests, allocate particular assets in proportionate or disproportionate shares, value the trust property for those purposes, and adjust for resulting differences in valuation and basis for income tax purposes;

Resolve a dispute concerning the interpretation of the trust or its administration by mediation, arbitration, or other procedure for alternative dispute resolution;

Prosecute or defend an action, claim, or judicial proceeding in any jurisdiction to protect trust property and the trustee in the performance of the trustee’s duties;

Sign and deliver contracts and other instruments that are useful to achieve or facilitate the exercise of the trustee’s powers;

On termination of the trust, exercise the powers appropriate to windup the administration of the trust and distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it;

Employ persons, including attorneys, auditors, investment advisors or agents, even if they are associated with the trustee, to advise or assist the trustee in the performance of his administrative duties; to act without independent investigation upon their recommendations; and instead of acting personally, to employ one or more agents to perform any act of administration, whether or not discretionary; and

A trustee may insure the life of any person in which the trustee of the trust has an insurable interest as set forth in Section 83-5-251.

A trustee may retain any life insurance policy contributed to a trust by a settlor, or purchased by the trustee upon the request of the settlor, as an asset of the trust without regard to any lack of diversification caused thereby and without regard to the terms and conditions of the life insurance policy. The trustee shall not be liable for lack of diversification to any beneficiary of a trust for the trustee’s retention of the life insurance policy.

With respect to a life insurance policy owned by the trust a trustee may:

Borrow funds from any party, including an insurance company, for the purpose of paying premiums on any policy of insurance owned by the trust and enter into a “split dollar” or other similar arrangement;

Collaterally assign any policy to a creditor of the trust;

Exercise any and all rights under any life insurance policy, including the power to pay, forego or adjust the amount of any premium payments, adjust the type and amount of death benefit, receive or apply dividends to premiums or purchase additional insurance, and allocate policy values among any subaccounts available under any variable or similar policy; and

With the consent of the insured, to sell any policy to a third party in a life settlement or viatical settlement transaction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 74, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-817.
Distribution upon termination.

Upon termination or partial termination of a trust, the trustee may send to the beneficiaries a proposal for distribution. The right of any beneficiary to object to the proposed distribution terminates if the beneficiary does not notify the trustee of an objection within thirty (30) days after the proposal was sent but only if the proposal informed the beneficiary of the right to object and of the time allowed for objection. For the purpose of determining the date a proposed distribution was sent, if exact confirmation is unavailable it can be assumed it was received five (5) days after the date of mailing.

Upon the occurrence of an event terminating or partially terminating a trust, the trustee shall proceed expeditiously to distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it, subject to the right of the trustee to retain a reasonable reserve for the payment of debts, expenses, and taxes.

A release by a beneficiary of a trustee from liability for breach of trust is invalid to the extent:

It was induced by improper conduct of the trustee; or

The beneficiary, at the time of the release, did not know of the material facts relating to the alleged breach and the trustee had actual knowledge of the facts relating to the alleged breach.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 75, eff from and after July 1, 2014.